Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5683
Funding under act; use.

Funding under the Rural Behavioral Health Training and Placement Program Act shall support:

(1) Faculty clinical training activities;

(2) Internship stipends for behavioral health interns and postdoctoral fellows; and

(3) Training and service provision expenses, including, but not limited to, travel to rural clinic sites, equipment, clinic space, patient-record management, scheduling, and telehealth supervision.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 41.